Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB146.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of limiting the number of terms that a member of
the General Assembly may serve, by limiting a Senator to four terms in the Kentucky
Senate, and limiting a Representative to eight terms in the Kentucky House of
Representatives, beginning with the regular election in 2028, by amending the
Constitution of Kentucky to read as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 32 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall be a Representative who, at the time of his election, is not a
citizen of Kentucky, has not attained the age of twenty-four years, and who has not
resided in this State two years next preceding his election, and the last year thereof in the
county, town or city for which he may be chosen. No person shall be a Senator who, at
the time of his election, is not a citizen of Kentucky, has not attained the age of thirty
years, and has not resided in this State six years next preceding his election, and the last
year thereof in the district for which he may be chosen.
(2) No person shall be elected to more than eight terms of office as a member of
the House of Representatives, or to more than four terms of office as a member of the
Senate. In determining the eligibility of an individual to hold an office as provided in
this section, time served in an office in fulfillment of a partial term as a result of a
special election to fill a vacancy shall not be considered unless the partial term is two
full years or more. Any person who is elected to an office in a regularly scheduled
election and resigns prior to the completion of the term for which he or she was elected
shall be considered to have served the full term in that office.
Section 3. It is further proposed as a schedule of transitional provisions for the
purposes of this amendment:
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 965
(1) The candidates for Representative and Senator who receive a certificate of
election for those elective offices following the regular election in November 2028 or
thereafter shall be subject to the provisions of this proposed amendment. The provisions
of this proposed amendment shall not include terms of office of Representatives from all
Representative Districts and Senators from even-numbered Senatorial Districts completed
prior to January 1, 2029, and terms of office of Senators from odd-numbered Senatorial
Districts completed prior to January 1, 2031.
(2) No candidate or office holder, other than those listed in subsection (1) of this
section, shall have his or her term of office affected by this proposed amendment.
Section 4. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 5 and 6
of this Act.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act, the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act, and the entirety of the schedule of transitional provisions contained in
Section 3 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general
circulation published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time
and in the same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for
their acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 6. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 965
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act, the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Section 2 of this Act, and the entirety of the schedule of transitional provisions contained
in Section 3 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall
have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the
ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/2/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed